North Dakota, session 69, HB1620.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 54-11 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
State fiscal transparency online portal.
1. The state treasurer, in consultation with the tax commissioner and state auditor, shall
develop and maintain a state fiscal transparency portal that is available to the public
on the state treasurer's website to provide information to taxpayers regarding the use
of state funds.
2. For each distribution of state funds to a recipient, subject to subsection 4, the website
must provide:
a. The identity of the recipient.
b. The amount of state funds distributed to the recipient.
c. The purpose, use, or intended use of the state funds.
3. Upon request from the state treasurer, tax commissioner, or state auditor, a recipient
of state funds or a state department, agency, or institution shall submit timely data
related to the use of state funds in the form and manner prescribed by the state
treasurer, tax commissioner, or state auditor.
4. As required by law, the state treasurer shall protect personally identifiable information
from unauthorized access and disclosure.
5. For purposes of this section:
a. "Recipient" means any recipient of state funds.
Page No. 1 25.1328.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
b. "State funds" means any public moneys raised under the authority of the state
and made available for expenditure by the state.
Page No. 2 25.1328.01000